Massachusetts, session 194th, H3690.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by inserting after Section 62 the following section:- 
Section 63 (A). A motor vehicle dealer licensed by the Registry of Motor Vehicles may 
impose a fee of no more than four hundred dollars ($400.00) for the preparation of various 
paperwork associated with the sale, financing, leasing, insurance, liens, warranties, federal and 
state disclosures and other procedures associated with the sale, leasing and financing of vehicles 
obtained or provided by the dealership on vehicle transactions in excess of two thousand five 
hundred dollars ($2500.00). Any motor vehicle dealer who charges a documentary preparation 
fee in connection with the sale of a motor vehicle for less than two thousand five hundred dollars 

of 2 10 ($2500.00) shall be subject to the imposition of a fine and/or the suspension or revocation of 
their license, determined by the Registry of Motor Vehicles.